Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20203-110
Rules and regulations; conform to federal regulation.

All rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the division under the authority of the State Aeronautics Act shall be kept in conformity, as nearly as may be, with the then current federal legislation governing aeronautics, the regulations duly promulgated thereunder, and rules and standards issued from time to time pursuant thereto.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 6(4), p. 84;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 10.

Power to adopt rules in conformity with federal regulations already in existence did not involve delegation of power by state to federal government. In re Estate of Kinsey, 152 Neb. 95, 40 N.W.2d 526 (1949).